District of Columbia statutes.
37-110

Enforcement.

In the event that a market vendor violates any law, regulation, sidewalk market rule or condition of the market vendor’s sub-lease as specified in the contract, the market manager may issue a market violation notice (“MVN”) to the market vendor suspending the market vendor’s sub-lease until the violation has been cured or corrected. If 3 MVNs are issued to a market vendor during the contract year, the market vendor’s sub-lease shall be cancelled. If the market manager decides not to renew a market vendor’s sub-lease, the market manager shall give the market vendor written notice on or before January 31. MVNs, cancellation, and any decision not to renew a market vendor’s sub-lease shall be effective immediately but may be appealed to the Department of General Services.

Apr. 16, 1999, D.C. Law 12-228, § 11, 46 DCR 1066
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 91(c), 59 DCR 6190

History

1981 Ed., § 10-310.

Prior Codifications

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Department of General Services” for “Office of Property Management” in the last sentence.

Effect of Amendments